California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) “Rejuvenate,” or words of like import such as “reactivate” or “restore,” means the repair of any internal malfunction of a picture tube by burning out shorts in the electron gun assembly, or flaking the cathode by heating and vibrating the cathode, or activities of a similar nature.

(c) “Seconds,” or terms of
 like import such as “rejects,” mean that the picture tube, though giving satisfactory performance, does not meet the quality and workmanship maintained by the manufacturer with respect to the general run of tubes of the same type.

(d) “Person” includes individual, partnership, firm, association, or corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 725.)
-------------------------------------------

17531.7.

(a) No manufacturer, processor, or distributor of television picture tubes shall sell, offer for sale, or expose for sale any such tube unless the television picture tube and its container, if any, are correctly labeled to indicate the new and used materials of such tube according to the schedule and manner as hereinafter provided.

Description of the picture tube by new and used components and materials shall be indicated by setting forth on the label the particular grade and verbatim description as selected from the following which applies to such tube. 
Schedule
Black and White Picture Tubes
Grade AA—Description—All new components and materials including new glass envelope.

Grade A—Description—Used glass envelope, all other components and materials are new.

Grade B—Description—Used glass envelope, used phosphorescent viewing screen, used aluminization, used internal conductive coating, all other components and materials are new.

Grade C—Description—Used picture tube for resale, all significant components and materials are used. 
Color Picture Tubes
Grade AA—Description—All new components and materials, including new glass envelope.

Grade A—Description—Used glass envelope, new or used shadow mask, all other components and materials are new.

Grade B—Description—New electron gun, all other components and materials are used.

Grade C—Description—Used picture tube for resale, all significant components and materials are used. 

(b) The fact that a used picture tube has been rejuvenated, or has a new or used brightener attached to it, or has fresh paint or coating on the outside, or any combination of the above, shall not change its status or description as a Grade C picture tube, and the terms “rebuilt” or “reconditioned” or words of like import shall not be used to describe such tube.

(c) Where a picture tube is a “second” such tube shall be designated by label as a “second” to the exclusion of any other grade designation or component description and the following additional notation shall appear verbatim on the label:—This picture tube is a manufacturer’s reject or
second line quality tube but it is capable of
giving satisfactory performance—

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 694.)
-------------------------------------------

17531.8.

No person other than a purchaser at retail for his own use and consumption shall remove, deface, cover, obliterate, mutilate, alter, or cause to be removed, defaced, covered, obliterated, mutilated, or altered any label required to be placed on a picture tube by this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 725.)
-------------------------------------------

17531.9.

Any person violating any of the provisions of Section 17531.7 or 17531.8 may be enjoined by any superior court of competent jurisdiction upon action for injunction, brought by the Attorney General or any district attorney in this state, and the superior court shall, after proof of violation, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining such conduct. This injunctive remedy shall not be construed to limit the district attorney of the county wherein the violation occurred from prosecuting criminal action for any violations of Section 17531.7 or 17531.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 725.)
-------------------------------------------

17532.

It is unlawful wilfully or knowingly, with intent to defraud, to sell or exchange, or offer or expose for sale or exchange, coal of a specific name or kind under any other name or description, or as the output of any mine other than the mine of which it is the product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

17533.

It is unlawful for any proprietor or publisher of any newspaper or periodical, including any newspaper or periodical published over the Internet, willfully and knowingly to misrepresent the circulation of the newspaper or periodical, for the purpose of securing advertising or other patronage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 599, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17533.5.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation or association to sell or offer for sale any surplus materials as defined in the Federal Surplus Property Act of 1944, being Chapter 479, Public Laws United States 457, approved October 3, 1944, if such person, firm, corporation or association does business, carries on or trades under or in any way uses in dealing with the public, directly or indirectly, any name which by reason of the inclusion of a word or words such as “Army,” “Navy,” “United States,” “Federal,” “treasury,” “procurement,” “G.I.,” or any others which connote the United States Government or its armed forces or
 any of its departments or agencies, has a tendency to lead the purchasing public to believe, contrary to fact, that the establishment at which such materials are offered for sale has some official relationship to the United States Government or that all of the articles sold or offered for sale are such surplus materials or that the articles there sold are of higher quality and lower prices than those elsewhere obtainable; provided, however, that this section shall not prohibit the continued use of a trade name by an establishment which for three years prior to the effective date of this section has continually used such word or words as its trade name or as a portion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

17533.6.

(a) Except as described in subdivisions (b) and (c), it is unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, or association that is a nongovernmental entity to use a seal, emblem, insignia, trade or brand name, or any other term, symbol, or content that reasonably could be interpreted or construed as implying any federal, state, or local government, military veteran entity, or military or veteran service organization connection, approval, or endorsement of any product or
 service, including, but not limited to, any financial product, goods, or services, by any means, including, but not limited to, a mailing, electronic message, Internet Web site, periodical, or television commercial disseminated in this state, unless the nongovernmental entity has an expressed connection with, or the approval or endorsement of, a federal, state, or local government, military veteran entity, or military or veteran service organization.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and if permitted by other provisions of law, any person, firm, corporation, or association that is a nongovernmental entity may advertise or promote any event, presentation, seminar, workshop, or other public gathering using a seal, emblem, insignia, trade or brand name, or any other term, symbol, or content as described in subdivision (a), if the person, firm, corporation, or association that is a nongovernmental entity has an expressed connection with, or the
 approval or endorsement of, a federal, state, or local government, military veteran entity, or military or veteran service organization.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any person, firm, corporation, or association that is a nongovernmental entity may solicit information, solicit the purchase of or payment for a product or service, or solicit the contribution of funds or membership fees, by any means, including, but not limited to, a mailing, electronic message, Internet Web site, periodical, or television commercial disseminated in this state, using a seal, emblem, insignia, trade or brand name, or any other term, symbol, or content as described in subdivision (a), if the person, firm, corporation, or association that is a nongovernmental entity meets the requirements of paragraph (1) or (2) as follows:

(1) The nongovernmental entity has an expressed connection with, or the
 approval or endorsement of, a federal, state, or local government entity, if permitted by other provisions of law.

(2) (A) The solicitation meets all of the following requirements:

(i) The solicitation conspicuously displays the following disclosure on the front and back of every page of the solicitation:
“THIS PRODUCT OR SERVICE HAS NOT BEEN APPROVED OR ENDORSED BY ANY GOVERNMENTAL AGENCY, AND THIS OFFER IS NOT BEING MADE BY AN AGENCY OF THE GOVERNMENT.”
(ii) In the case of a mailed solicitation, the front of the envelope, outside cover, or wrapper in which the matter is mailed conspicuously displays the following disclosure:
“THIS IS NOT A GOVERNMENT DOCUMENT.”
(iii) If permitted by other provisions of law, in the case of a television commercial disseminated in this state, the solicitation conspicuously displays the following disclosure at the top of the television screen for the entire duration of the television commercial:
“THIS PRODUCT OR SERVICE HAS NOT BEEN APPROVED OR ENDORSED BY ANY GOVERNMENTAL AGENCY, AND THIS OFFER IS NOT BEING MADE BY AN AGENCY OF THE GOVERNMENT.”
(iv) The disclosure in clause (i) shall be displayed conspicuously, as provided in subdivision (f), and immediately below each portion of the solicitation that
 reasonably could be construed to specify an amount due and payable by the recipient. The disclosure in clause (ii) shall be displayed conspicuously, as provided in subdivision (f), and immediately below the area of the envelope, outside cover, or wrapper that is used for a return address. The disclosure in clause (iii) shall be displayed conspicuously, as provided in subdivision (f), and at the top of the television screen. The disclosures in clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) shall not be preceded, followed, or surrounded by symbols, terms, or other content that result in the disclosures not being conspicuous or that introduce, modify, qualify, or explain the text of those disclosures.

(v) The solicitation does not use a title or trade or brand name that reasonably could be interpreted or construed as implying any federal, state, or local government connection, approval, or endorsement, including, but not limited to, use of the term “agency,”
 “administrative,” “assessor,” “board,” “bureau,” “collector,” “commission,” “committee,” “department,” “division,” “recorder,” “unit,” “federal,” “state,” “county,” “city,” or “municipal,” or the name or division of any government agency.

(vi) The solicitation does not specify a date or time period when payment to the soliciting nongovernmental person, firm, corporation, or association is due, including, but not limited to, use of the terms “due date,” “due now,” “remit by,” “remit immediately,” “payment due,” “pay now,” “pay immediately,” or “pay no later than,” unless the solicitation displays, in the same sentence as the date or time period specified, how the information being solicited will be used, a description of the product or service that is to be provided and to what government agency it shall be rendered, or how the solicited funds or membership fees will be used, as applicable.

(vii) The solicitation does not state or imply that payment to any person, firm, corporation, or association that is not a government entity is mandatory or required by law, or state or imply that penalties, fines, or consequences will occur if payment is not made to the soliciting nongovernmental person, firm, corporation, or association.

(B) Subparagraph (A) is not applicable to seals, emblems, insignia, trade or brand name, or any other term, symbol, or content of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the Department of Veterans Affairs, the federal and state military, military veteran entities, and military or veteran service organizations.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 17534, any violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars
 ($2,500), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(e) Any person who is harmed as a result of a violation of this section shall be entitled to recover, in addition to any other available remedies, damages in an amount equal to three times the amount solicited.

(f) For purposes of this section, “conspicuous” or “conspicuously” means displayed apart from other print on the page, envelope, outside cover, or wrapper and in not less than 12-point boldface font type in capital letters that is at least 2-point boldface font type sizes larger than the next largest print on the page, envelope, outside cover, or wrapper and in contrasting type, layout, font, or color in a manner that clearly calls attention to the language.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 695, Sec. 1.   (SB 272)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

17533.6.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a person, firm, corporation, or association that is a nongovernmental entity may solicit a fee for providing a copy of a public record if that solicitation meets all of the requirements set forth in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive:

(1) Contains at the top of the solicitation, in at least 24-point type, all of the following:

(A) The following disclosure statement: “THIS IS AN ADVERTISEMENT. THIS OFFER IS NOT BEING MADE BY, OR ON BEHALF OF, ANY GOVERNMENT AGENCY. YOU ARE NOT REQUIRED TO MAKE ANY PAYMENT OR TAKE ANY OTHER ACTION IN RESPONSE TO THIS OFFER.”

(B) The fee or cost charged by the relevant state or local agency to obtain a copy of the record that the solicitation is offering to obtain.

(C) The information necessary to contact the state or local agency that has custody of the record.

(D) The name and physical address of the nongovernmental entity soliciting the fee.

(2) The disclosures in paragraph (1) shall not be preceded, followed, or surrounded by symbols, terms, or other content that result in the
 disclosures not being conspicuous or that introduce, modify, qualify, or explain the text of those disclosures.

(3) A solicitation subject to this subdivision shall not be in a form, use deadline dates, or contain other language or content that reasonably could be interpreted or construed as implying:

(A) That it was issued by a state or local government agency or is otherwise connected, approved, or endorsed by a state or local government agency.

(B) A legal duty on the person being solicited, that any payment to the nongovernmental entity is mandatory or required by law, or that penalties, fines, or other consequences will occur if payment is not made by that person.

(b) The Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney may bring an action
 against any person who violates this section. The court may order the person who violates this section to refund all of the moneys paid to the victim. The court shall impose a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each solicitation document distributed in violation of this section, and not more than two hundred dollars ($200) for each subsequent document distributed in violation of this section. The civil penalty shall be payable to the general fund of whichever governmental entity brought the action to assess the civil penalty. 

(c) As used in this section, “solicit” means to directly advertise or market through writing or graphics and via mail, telefax, or email to an individually identified person, residence, or business location. “Solicit” does not include any of the following:

(1) Communicating through a mass advertisement, including a catalog, a radio
 or television broadcast, or an Internet Web site.

(2) Communicating via telephone, mail, or electronic communication, if initiated by the consumer.

(3) Advertising the sale of public data to other businesses and entities for a legitimate business purpose, including to research and reporting firms, government agencies, government procurement officers, and government contractors who receive value-added benefits for the purchase and use of public data.

(d) This section does not apply to a title insurance company authorized to do business in this state or its authorized agent.

(e) This section is not subject to Section 17534 or any other criminal penalty provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 293, Sec. 2.   (AB 492)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17533.7.

(a) It is unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, or association to sell or offer for sale in this state any merchandise on which merchandise or on its container there appears the words “Made in U.S.A.,” “Made in America,” “U.S.A.,” or similar words if the merchandise or any article, unit, or part thereof, has been entirely or substantially made, manufactured, or produced outside of the United States.

(b) This section shall not apply to merchandise made, manufactured, or produced in the United States that has one or more articles, units, or parts from outside of the United States, if all of the articles, units, or parts of the merchandise obtained from outside the United States constitute not more than 5 percent of the final wholesale value of the manufactured product.

(c) (1) This section shall not apply to merchandise made, manufactured, or produced in the United States that has one or more articles, units, or parts from outside of the United States, if both of the following apply:

(A) The manufacturer of the merchandise shows that it can neither produce the article, unit, or part within the United States nor obtain the article, unit, or part of the merchandise from a domestic source.

(B) All of the articles, units, or parts of the merchandise obtained from outside the United States constitute not more than 10 percent of the final wholesale value of the manufactured product.

(2) The determination that the article, unit, or part of the merchandise cannot be made, manufactured, produced, or obtained within the United States from a domestic source shall not be based on the cost of the article, unit, or part.

(d) This section shall not apply to merchandise sold for resale to consumers outside of California.

(e) For purposes of this section, merchandise sold or offered for sale outside of California shall not be deemed mislabeled if the label conforms to the law of the forum state or country within which they are sold or offered for
 sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (SB 633)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17533.8.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to offer, by mail, by telephone, in person, or by any other means or in any other form, including over the Internet, a prize or gift, with the intent to offer a sales presentation, without disclosing at the time of the offer of the prize or gift, in a clear and unequivocal manner, the intent to offer that sales presentation.

(b) This section shall not apply to the publisher of any newspaper, periodical, or other publication, or any radio or
 television broadcaster, or the owner or operator of any cable, satellite, or other medium of communications who broadcasts or publishes, including over the Internet, an advertisement or offer in good faith, without knowledge of its violation of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 599, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17533.9.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, or association, in any newspaper, magazine, circular, form letter, or open publication, published, distributed, or circulated in this state, including over the Internet, or on any billboard, card, label, or other advertising medium, or by means of any other advertising device, to advertise the sale of tear gas, tear gas devices, and tear gas weapons, as defined in Sections 17240 and 17250 of the Penal
 Code, unless there is conspicuously displayed or stated in connection with the name and description of that tear gas, or those tear gas weapons or devices, a direct and unequivocal statement that will clearly indicate that possession or transportation of tear gas and tear gas weapons or devices is prohibited by law unless specifically exempted or permitted pursuant to the authority contained in Division 11 (commencing with Section 22810) of Title 3 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 14.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

17533.10.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, or association, in any newspaper, magazine, circular, form letter, or open publication, published, distributed, or circulated in this state, including over the Internet, or on any billboard, card, label, or other advertising medium, or by means of any other advertising device, to advertise the sale of anabolic steroids, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 11056 of the Health and Safety Code, unless there is conspicuously displayed or stated in connection with the name and description of any of those
 anabolic steroids, a direct and unequivocal statement that will clearly indicate that the possession by, or sale to, an ultimate consumer of anabolic steroids is a crime punishable by a substantial fine and imprisonment, unless upon the prescription of a physician, dentist, podiatrist, or veterinarian, licensed to practice in this state, pursuant to Sections 11377, 11378, and 11379 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 599, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17534.

Any person, firm, corporation, partnership or association or any employee or agent thereof who violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

17534.5.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, the remedies or penalties provided by this chapter are cumulative to each other and to the remedies or penalties available under all other laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 393.)
-------------------------------------------

17535.

Obtaining Injunctive Relief

Any person, corporation, firm, partnership, joint stock company, or any other association or organization which violates or proposes to violate this chapter may be enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction. The court may make such orders or judgments, including
 the appointment of a receiver, as may be necessary to prevent the use or employment by any person, corporation, firm, partnership, joint stock company, or any other association or organization of any practices which violate this chapter, or which may be necessary to restore to any person in interest any money or property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of any practice in this chapter declared to be unlawful.

Actions for injunction under this section may be prosecuted by the Attorney General or any district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor in this state in the name of the people of the State of California upon their own complaint or upon the complaint of any board, officer, person, corporation or association or by any person who has suffered injury in fact and has lost money or property as a result of a violation of this chapter. Any person may pursue representative claims or relief on behalf of others only if the
 claimant meets the standing requirements of this section and complies with Section 382 of the Code of Civil Procedure, but these limitations do not apply to claims brought under this chapter by the Attorney General, or any district attorney, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor in this state.

(History: Amended November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 64, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

17535.5.

(a) Any person who intentionally violates any injunction issued pursuant to Section 17535 shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000) for each violation. Where the conduct constituting a violation is of a continuing nature, each day of such conduct is a separate and distinct violation. In determining the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall consider all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of harm caused by the conduct constituting a violation, the nature and persistence of such conduct, the length of time over which the
 conduct occurred, the assets, liabilities and net worth of the person, whether corporate or individual, and any corrective action taken by the defendant.

(b) The civil penalty prescribed by this section shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in any county in which the violation occurs or where the injunction was issued in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney in any court of competent jurisdiction within his jurisdiction without regard to the county from which the original injunction was issued. An action brought pursuant to this section to recover such civil penalties shall take special precedence over all civil matters on the calendar of the court except those matters to which equal precedence on the calendar is granted by law.

(c) If such an action is brought by
 the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the State Treasurer. If brought by a district attorney or county counsel, the entire amount of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the city.

(d) If the action is brought at the request of a board within the Department of Consumer Affairs or a local consumer affairs agency, the court shall determine the reasonable expenses incurred by the board or local agency in the investigation and prosecution of the action.

Before any penalty collected is paid out pursuant to subdivision (c), the amount of such
 reasonable expenses incurred by the board shall be paid to the State Treasurer for deposit in the special fund of the board described in Section 205. If the board has no such special fund, the moneys shall be paid to the State Treasurer. The amount of such reasonable expenses incurred by a local consumer affairs agency shall be paid to the general fund of the municipality or county which funds the local agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

17536.

Penalty for Violations of Chapter; Proceedings; Disposition of Proceeds

(a) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, which shall be assessed and
 recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) The court shall impose a civil penalty for each violation of this chapter. In assessing the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall consider any one or more of the relevant circumstances presented by any of the parties to the case, including, but not limited to, the following: the nature and seriousness of the misconduct, the number of violations, the persistence of the misconduct, the length of time over which the misconduct occurred, the willfulness of the defendant’s misconduct, and the defendant’s assets, liabilities, and net worth.

(c) If the action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the
 county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the State Treasurer.

If brought by a district attorney or county counsel, the entire amount of penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county and one-half to the city. The aforementioned funds shall be for the exclusive use by the Attorney General, district attorney, county counsel, and city attorney for the enforcement of consumer protection laws.

(d) If the action is brought at the request of a board within the Department of Consumer Affairs or a local consumer affairs agency, the court shall determine the reasonable expenses incurred by the board or local agency in the investigation and prosecution of the action.

Before any penalty
 collected is paid out pursuant to subdivision (c), the amount of such reasonable expenses incurred by the board shall be paid to the State Treasurer for deposit in the special fund of the board described in Section 205. If the board has no such special fund the moneys shall be paid to the State Treasurer. The amount of such reasonable expenses incurred by a local consumer affairs agency shall be paid to the general fund of the municipality which funds the local agency.

(e) As applied to the penalties for acts in violation of Section 17530, the remedies provided by this section and Section 17534 are mutually exclusive.

(History: Amended November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 64, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

17536.5.

If a violation of this chapter is alleged or the application or construction of this chapter is in issue in any proceeding in the Supreme Court of California, a state court of appeal, or the appellate division of a superior court, each person filing any brief or petition with the court in that proceeding shall serve, within three days of filing with the court, a copy of that brief or petition on the Attorney General, directed to the attention of the Consumer Protection Section at a service address designated on the Attorney General’s official internet website for service of papers under this section or, if no service address is designated, at the Attorney General’s office in the City of San Francisco and on the district attorney of the county in which the lower court action or proceeding was originally filed.
 Upon the Attorney General’s or district attorney’s request, each person who has filed any other document, including all or a portion of the appellate record, with the court in addition to a brief or petition shall provide a copy of that document without charge to the Attorney General or the district attorney within five days of the request. The time for service may be extended by the Chief Justice or presiding justice or judge for good cause shown. No judgment or relief, temporary or permanent, shall be granted or opinion issued until proof of service of the petition or brief on the Attorney General and district attorney is filed with the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 4.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to use the term “prize” or “gift” or other similar term in any manner that would be untrue or misleading, including, but not limited to, the manner made unlawful in subdivision (b) or (c).

(b) It is unlawful to notify any person by any means, as a part of an advertising plan or program, that he or she has won a prize and that as a condition of receiving such prize he or she must pay any money or purchase or rent any goods or services.

(c) It is unlawful to notify any person by any means that he or she will receive a gift and that as a condition of receiving the gift he or she must pay any money, or purchase or lease (including rent) any goods or services, if any one or more of the following conditions exist:

(1) The shipping charge, depending on the method of shipping used, exceeds (A) the average cost of postage or the average charge of a delivery service in the business of delivering goods of like size, weight, and kind for shippers other than the offeror of the gift for the geographic area in which the gift is being distributed, or (B) the exact amount for shipping paid to an independent fulfillment house or an independent supplier, either of which is in the business of shipping goods for shippers other than the offeror of the gift.

(2) The
 handling charge (A) is not reasonable, or (B) exceeds the actual cost of handling, or (C) exceeds the greater of three dollars ($3) in any transaction or 80 percent of the actual cost of the gift item to the offeror or its agent, or (D) in the case of a general merchandise retailer, exceeds the actual amount for handling paid to an independent fulfillment house or supplier, either of which is in the business of handling goods for businesses other than the offeror of the gift.

(3) Any goods or services which must be purchased or leased by the offeree of the gift in order to obtain the gift could have been purchased through the same marketing channel in which the gift was offered for a lower price without the gift items at or proximate to the time the gift was offered.

(4) The majority of the gift offeror’s sales or leases within the preceding year, through the marketing channel in
 which the gift is offered or through in-person sales at retail outlets, of the type of goods or services which must be purchased or leased in order to obtain the gift item was made in conjunction with the offer of a gift.

This paragraph does not apply to a gift offer made by a general merchandise retailer in conjunction with the sale or lease through mail order of goods or services (excluding catalog sales) if (A) the goods or services are of a type unlike any other type of goods or services sold or leased by the general merchandise retailer at any time during the period beginning six months before and continuing until six months after the gift offer, (B) the gift offer does not extend for a period of more than two months, and (C) the gift offer is not untrue or misleading in any manner.

(5) The gift offeror represents that the offeree has been specially selected in any manner unless (A) the
 representation is true and (B) the offeree made a purchase from the gift offeror within the six-month period before the gift offer was made or has a credit card issued by, or a retail installment account with, the gift offeror.

(d) The following definitions apply to this section:

(1) “Marketing channel” means a method of retail distribution, including, but not limited to, catalog sales, mail order, telephone sales, and in-person sales at retail outlets.

(2) “General merchandise retailer” means any person or entity regardless of the form of organization that has continuously offered for sale or lease more than 100 different types of goods or services to the public in California throughout a period exceeding five years.

(e) Each violation of the
 provisions of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 812, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.1.

(a) It is unlawful for any person, or an employee, agent, or independent contractor employed or authorized by that person, by any means, as part of an advertising plan or program, to offer any incentive as an inducement to the recipient to visit a location, attend a sales presentation, or contact a sales agent in person, by telephone, or by mail, unless the offer clearly and conspicuously discloses in writing, in readily understandable language, all of the
 information required in paragraphs (1) and (2). If the offer is not initially made in writing, the required disclosures shall be received by the recipient in writing prior to any scheduled visit to a location, sales presentation, or contact with a sales agent. For purposes of this section, the term “incentive” means any item or service of value, including, but not limited to, any prize, gift, money, or other tangible property.

(1) The following disclosures shall appear on the front (or first) page of the offer:

(A) The name and street address of the owner of the real or personal property or the provider of the services which are the subject of the visit, sales presentation, or contact with a sales agent. If the offer is made by an agent or independent contractor employed or authorized by the owner or provider, or is made under a name other than the true name of the owner or
 provider, the name of the owner or provider shall be more prominently and conspicuously displayed than the name of the agent, independent contractor, or other name.

(B) A general description of the business of the owner or provider identified pursuant to subparagraph (A), and the purpose of any requested visit, sales presentation, or contact with a sales agent, which shall include a general description of the real or personal property or services which are the subject of the sales presentation and a clear statement, if applicable, that there will be a sales presentation and the approximate duration of the visit and sales presentation.

(C) If the recipient is not assured of receiving any particular incentive, a statement of the odds of receiving each incentive offered or, in the alternative, a clear statement describing the location in the offer where the odds can be found. The
 odds shall be stated in whole Arabic numbers in a format such as: “1 chance in 100,000” or “1:100,000.” The odds and, where applicable, the alternative statement describing their location, shall be printed in a type size that is at least equal to that used for the standard text on the front (or first) page of the offer.

(D) A clear statement, if applicable, that the offer is subject to specific restrictions, qualifications, and conditions and a statement describing the location in the offer where the restrictions, qualifications, and conditions may be found. Both statements shall be printed in a type size that is at least equal to that used for the standard text on the front (or first) page of the offer.

(2) The following disclosures shall appear in the offer, but need not appear on the front (or first) page of the offer:

(A) Unless the odds are disclosed on the front (or first) page of the offer, a statement of the odds of receiving each incentive offered, printed in the size and format set forth in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1).

(B) All restrictions, qualifications, and other conditions which must be satisfied before the recipient is entitled to receive the incentive, including, but not limited to:

(i) Any deadline by which the recipient must visit the location, attend the sales presentation, or contact the sales agent in order to receive an incentive.
